Massachusetts, session 194th, S843.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 15 of chapter 12C of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 343
of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (b, and inserting in place
thereof the following subsection:-
(b) There shall be established within the center the Betsy Lehman center for patient safety
and medical error reduction. The purpose of the Lehman center shall be to serve as a
clearinghouse for the development, evaluation and dissemination, including, but not limited to,
the sponsorship of training and education programs, of best practices for patient safety and
medical error reduction. The Lehman center shall: (1) coordinate the efforts of state agencies
engaged in the regulation, contracting or delivery of health care and those individuals or
of 2

institutions licensed by the commonwealth to provide health care to meet their responsibilities
for patient safety and medical error reduction; and (2) convene all such entities, consumers, and
others with experience and expertise in patient safety to develop and implement a statewide
strategic plan for improving safety for patients and the health care workforce across the
continuum of care. The Lehman center shall coordinate state participation in any appropriate
state or federal reports or data collection efforts relative to patient safety and medical error
reduction. The Lehman center shall analyze available data, research and reports for information
that would improve education and training programs that promote patient safety. The Lehman
center shall evaluate approaches for monitoring and improving the performance of the health
care system through enhanced patient safety data resources.
SECTION 2. Said section 15 of said chapter 12C of the General Laws, as amended by
chapter 343 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended, in subsection (h), by inserting after
the second sentence the following sentence:-
The Lehman center may establish a trust fund that is structured to receive, maintain, and
spend federal and foundation grants in furtherance of its responsibilities under this section and,
to such extent, the director of the Lehman center shall have the powers provided in section 6 of
chapter 6A.
of 2